Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-814
Teachers' and administrators' certificates or permits; limitations on use.

The board may limit the use of any certificate or permit issued under sections 79-806 to 79-815.

Laws 1963, c. 491, § 9, p. 1572;

Laws 1985, LB 633, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1247.11;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 444;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 24;

Laws 2003, LB 685, § 13.